Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,216
Local emergency planning committee; chairperson; meetings.

Each local emergency planning committee shall annually elect a chairperson. Each committee shall meet at least annually and may meet more often at the call of the chairperson or at the request of any three members.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 26.